Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-723
Supreme Court; record of proceedings; review; order; retirement, removal, or suspension; effect.

The Supreme Court shall review the record of the proceedings and in its discretion may permit the introduction of additional evidence. The Supreme Court shall make such determination as it finds just and proper, and may order the reprimand, discipline, censure, suspension without pay for a definite period of time not to exceed six months, removal, or retirement of such Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge, or may wholly reject the recommendation. Upon an order for retirement, the Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge shall thereby be retired with the same rights and privileges as if he or she had retired pursuant to statute. Upon an order for removal, the Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge shall be removed from office, his or her salary shall cease from the date of such order, and he or she shall be ineligible for judicial office. Upon an order for suspension, the Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge shall draw no salary and shall perform no judicial functions during the period of suspension. Suspension shall not create a vacancy in the office of Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 9, p. 433;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 8.